Tennessee, session 114, SB0524.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 3-1-107, is amended by deleting
subdivision (a)(1) and substituting:
(1) Beginning with the election of the One Hundred Fifteenth General Assembly,
each member shall receive an annual salary of forty-eight thousand nine hundred ninety-
nine dollars ($48,999), payable in equal monthly installments and subject to adjustment
pursuant to subsection (c).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 3-1-107, is amended by deleting
subsection (c) and substituting:
(c) For the fiscal year beginning in 2027, and for each subsequent fiscal year,
the base salary fixed in subdivision (a)(1) must be adjusted to reflect the average
percentage pay increase provided for state employees by the general appropriations act.
However, any adjustments occurring during a term of the general assembly must not
take effect until the election of the next general assembly. On or before November 1 of
each year, the comptroller of the treasury shall certify to the office of legislative
administration such average increase in state employee's compensation during that
fiscal year.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 3-1-106(f), is amended by deleting
from subdivision (1) the language "one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($1,250)" and
substituting "two thousand dollars ($2,000)", and is further amended by deleting from
SB0524
000745
- 1 -

subdivision (3) the language "On the date of the statewide general election in 2024" and
substituting "On the date of the statewide general election in 2026".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 3-1-106, is amended by deleting
subsection (g) and substituting:
(g) Beginning with the election of the One Hundred Fifteenth General Assembly,
the base reimbursement amount for expense and mileage allowances authorized under
this section for members of the general assembly must be increased by twenty-five
percent (25%).
SECTION 5. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000745